New York, session 2025-2026, S2063.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The agriculture and markets law is amended by adding a new 2 section 355-a to read as follows: 3 § 355-a. Aggravated neglect. 1. An owner shall be liable for aggra- 4 vated neglect when a companion animal is subjected to cruelty, as 5 defined in section three hundred fifty of this article, and the owner 6 has not taken reasonable steps to locate the animal or provide adequate 7 care. For the purposes of this section the term abandonment shall have 8 the same meaning as supplied in section three hundred fifty-five of this 9 article provided, however that the fine and sentencing guidelines shall 10 be as proscribed herein. 11 2. Aggravated neglect of companion animals is a felony. A defendant 12 convicted of this offense shall be sentenced pursuant to paragraph (b) 13 of subdivision one of section 55.10 of the penal law provided, however, 14 that any term of imprisonment imposed for violation of this section 15 shall be a definite sentence, which may not exceed two years. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04329-01-5